src/morphology/roots/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'matka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:puolessa{#}matkassa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'matka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli{#}matka Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'matka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli{#}matka Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'matka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:puolta{#}matkata  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'matka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoleksi{#}matkakse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'matka][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoleksi{#}matkaksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:puolitta{#}päivittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:puolilta{#}päiviltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:puolilla{#}päivillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:puolille{#}päiville Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:puolista{#}päivistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:puolina{#}päivinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolien{#}päivien   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolten{#}päivien   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:puolissa{#}päivissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:puolet{#}päivät Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:puolia{#}päiviä     Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}päivikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}päiviksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:puoletta{#}päivättä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:puolelta{#}päivältä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:puolella{#}päivällä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:puolelle{#}päivälle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:puolesta{#}päivästä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:puolena{#}päivänä   Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:puolen{#}päivän Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:puolessa{#}päivässä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli{#}päivä Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli{#}päivä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:puolta{#}päivää   Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}päiväkse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'päivä][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}päiväksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:puolitta{#}väleittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:puolilta{#}väleiltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:puolilla{#}väleillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:puolille{#}väleille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:puolista{#}väleistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:puolina{#}väleinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolien{#}välien   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolten{#}välien   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:puolissa{#}väleissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:puolet{#}välit Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:puolia{#}välejä    Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}väleikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}väleiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:puoletta{#}välittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:puolelta{#}väliltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:puolella{#}välillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:puolelle{#}välille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:puolesta{#}välistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:puolena{#}välinä   Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:puolen{#}välin Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:puolessa{#}välissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli{#}väli Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli{#}väli Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:puolta{#}väliä   Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}välikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'väli][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}väliksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:puolitta{#}öittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:puolilta{#}öiltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:puolilla{#}öillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:puolille{#}öille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:puolista{#}öistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:puolina{#}öinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolien{#}öiden   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:puolten{#}öiden   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:puolissa{#}öissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:puolet{#}yöt Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:puolia{#}öitä    Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}öikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}öiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:puoletta{#}yöttä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:puolelta{#}yöltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:puolella{#}yöllä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:puolelle{#}yölle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:puolesta{#}yöstä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:puolena{#}yönä   Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:puolen{#}yön Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:puolessa{#}yössä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli{#}yö Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:puoli{#}yö Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:puolta{#}yötä  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}yökse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=puoli'|'yö][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:puoliksi{#}yöksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:raittiitta{#}ilmoitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:raittiilta{#}ilmoilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:raittiilla{#}ilmoilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:raittiille{#}ilmoille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:raittiista{#}ilmoista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:raittiina{#}ilmoina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:raittiiden{#}ilmoiden   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:raittiissa{#}ilmoissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:raittiit{#}ilmat Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:raittiita{#}ilmoita    Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:raittiiksi{#}ilmoikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:raittiiksi{#}ilmoiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:raittiitta{#}ilmatta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:raittiilta{#}ilmalta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:raittiilla{#}ilmalla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:raittiille{#}ilmalle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:raittiista{#}ilmasta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:raittiina{#}ilmana   Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:raittiin{#}ilman Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:raittiissa{#}ilmassa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:raitis{#}ilma Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:raitis{#}ilma Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:raitista{#}ilmaa  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:raittiiksi{#}ilmakse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=raitis'|'ilma][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:raittiiksi{#}ilmaksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:raskaitta{#}sarjoitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:raskaitta{#}sarjoitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:raskailta{#}sarjoilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:raskailta{#}sarjoilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:raskailla{#}sarjoilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:raskailla{#}sarjoilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:raskaille{#}sarjoille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:raskaille{#}sarjoille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:raskaista{#}sarjoista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:raskaista{#}sarjoista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:raskaina{#}sarjoina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:raskaina{#}sarjoina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:raskaiden{#}sarjojen   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:raskaiden{#}sarjojen   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:raskaissa{#}sarjoissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:raskaissa{#}sarjoissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:raskaat{#}sarjat Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:raskaat{#}sarjat Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=raskas'|'sarja][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:raskaita{#}sarjoja    Possessive/Optional ;
